pt-BR: Ajuste do raio da escala: Ajustável/autoajustável; Plano; Abaulado; Outro
da: Tilpasning til gribebrættets radius: Justerbar / selvjusterende; Flad; Buet; Andet
zh-TW: 適用指板弧度: 可調 / 自動調整; 平坦; 弧形; 其他
it: Adattamento del raggio della tastiera: Regolabile/autoregolante; Piatto; Con raggio; Altro
pl: Dopasowanie promienia podstrunnicy: Regulowany / samoregulujący; Płaski; Zaokrąglony; Inny
en: Fretboard radius fit: Adjustable / self-adjusting; Flat; Radiused; Other
ro-RO: Ajustarea spațiul ladurilor: Ajustabil/auto-ajustabil; Plat; Curbat; Altele
ko: 지판 곡률 호환성: 조절 가능/자동 조절; 플랫; 곡면; 기타
fr: Compatibilité avec le radius de la touche: Réglable / à réglage automatique; Plat; Galbé; Autre
zh-CN: 指板弧度适配: 可调节 / 自动调节; 平板; 弧形; 其他
hu: A fogólap sugárának illesztése: Állítható / önbeálló; Lapos; Íves; Egyéb
es: Ajuste del radio del diapasón: Ajustable/autoajustable; Plano; Con radio; Otro
de: Passung für Griffbrettradius: Verstellbar / Selbstjustierend; Flach; Gewölbt; Sonstiges
cs: Poloměr hmatníku: Nastavitelné / samočinné; Plochý; S rádiusem; Jiné
th: รัศมีฟิงเกอร์บอร์ดพอดี: ปรับได้ / ปรับเองอัตโนมัติ; แบน; โค้ง; อื่นๆ
el: Προσαρμογή ακτίνας ταστιέρας: Ρυθμιζόμενο / αυτορρυθμιζόμενο; Επίπεδο; Με καμπυλότητα; Άλλο
ja: 指板の半径フィット: 調整可能/自動調整; フラット; アール付き; その他
bg-BG: Съвместимост с радиуса на грифа: Регулируем / саморегулиращ се; Плосък; Заоблен (с радиус); Друго
pt-PT: Ajuste do raio da escala: Ajustável/autoajustável; Plano; Curvado; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su grifo spinduliu: Reguliuojamas / savaime prisitaikantis; Plokščias; Lenktas (su spinduliu); Kita
ru: Соответствие радиусу накладки грифа: Регулируемый / саморегулирующийся; Плоский; Закругленный; Другое
nb: Tilpasset radius på gripebrettet: Justerbar / selvjusterende; Flat; Buet; Annet
sl-SI: Prilagoditev polmeru ubiralke: Nastavljivo / samonastavljivo; Ravno; Zaobljeno; Drugo
tr: Klavye yarıçap uyumluluğu: Ayarlanabilir / otomatik ayarlanan; Düz; Kavisli; Diğer
vi: Độ phù hợp với bán kính cần đàn: Có thể điều chỉnh / tự điều chỉnh; Phẳng; Cong; Khác
nl: Geschiktheid voor toetsradius: Verstelbaar / zelfinstellend; Plat; Met radius; Overige
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s rádiusom hmatníka: Nastaviteľné/samonastaviteľné; Ploché; Zaoblené; Iné
sv: Greppbrädans radiepassning: Justerbar/självjusterande; Platt; Välvd; Övrigt
fi: Otelaudan kaarevuus: Säädettävä / itsesäätyvä; Tasainen; Kaareva; Muu
hr-HR: Prilagođavanje radijusa praga: Podesivo / samopodesivo; Ravno; Zaobljeno; Ostalo